Louisiana, session 2026, HB79.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:1109(B) through (F) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§1109. Cessation of storage operations; limited liability release
* * *
B.(1) In any civil liability action against the owner or operator of a storage
facility, carbon dioxide transmission pipeline, or the generator of the carbon dioxide
being handled by either the facility or pipeline, the maximum amount recoverable
as compensatory damages for noneconomic loss shall not exceed two hundred fifty
thousand dollars per person, except where the damages for noneconomic loss
suffered by the plaintiff were for wrongful death; permanent and substantial physical
deformity; loss of use of a limb or loss of a bodily organ system; or permanent
physical or mental functional injury that permanently prevents the injured person
from being able to independently care for himself or herself and perform life-
sustaining activities. In such cases, the maximum amount recoverable as
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 79 ENROLLED
compensatory damages for noneconomic loss shall not exceed five hundred thousand
dollars per person.
(2) If Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, or the application thereof to any
person or circumstance, is finally determined by a court of law to be unconstitutional
or otherwise invalid, the maximum amount recoverable as damages for noneconomic
loss shall thereafter not exceed one million dollars per person. This provision shall
not supersede any contractual agreement with respect to liability between a plaintiff
and an owner or operator of a storage facility, a carbon dioxide transmission
pipeline, or the generator of the carbon dioxide.
C. Nothing in this Chapter shall establish or create establishes or creates any
liability or responsibility on the part of the secretary or the state to pay any costs
associated with site restoration from any source other than the funds or trusts created
by this Chapter, nor shall the secretary or the state of Louisiana have any liability or
responsibility to make any payments for costs associated with site restoration if the
trusts created herein are insufficient to do so.
D. C. The secretary or his agents, on proper identification, may enter the land
of another for purposes of site assessment or restoration.
E. D. The secretary and his agents are not liable for any damages arising
from an act or omission if the act or omission is part of a good faith effort to carry
out the purpose of this Chapter.
F. E. No party contracting with the Department of Conservation and Energy,
or the secretary under the provisions of this Chapter shall be deemed to be a public
employee or an employee otherwise subject to the provisions of Parts I through IV
of Chapter 15 of Title 42 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
G. F. The secretary shall implement this Section in a manner consistent with
and as the secretary deems necessary to carry out the purposes and requirements of
the federal Safe Drinking Water Act, as amended, relating to the state's participation
in the underground injection control program established under that Act with respect
to the storage and sequestration of carbon dioxide, including but not limited to the
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 79 ENROLLED
state's authority to restrain any person from engaging in any unauthorized activity
which is endangering or causing damage to public health or the environment.
Section 2. R.S. 30:1109(G) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.